District of Columbia statutes.
47-2884.19

Severability.

If any provision of this part or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the remainder of the part, and the application of such provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby.

Aug. 16, 1956, 70 Stat. 1043, ch. 970, § 20
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 302, 59 DCR 6190
1981 Ed., § 2-1919.
1973 Ed., § 2-2019.
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law.